Utah statutes.
62A-3-311.1.   Statewide database -- Restricted use and access.

(1)  The division shall maintain a database for reports of vulnerable adult abuse, neglect, or exploitation made pursuant to this part.

(2)  The database shall include:

(a)  the names and identifying data of the alleged abused, neglected, or exploited vulnerable adult and the alleged perpetrator;

(b)  information regarding whether or not the allegation of abuse, neglect, or exploitation was found to be:

(i)  supported;

(ii)  inconclusive;

(iii)  without merit; or

(iv)  for reports for which the finding is made before May 5, 2008:

(A)  substantiated; or

(B)  unsubstantiated; and

(c)  any other information that may be helpful in furthering the purposes of this part, as determined by the division.

(3)  Information obtained from the database may be used only:

(a) for statistical summaries compiled by the department that do not include names or other identifying data;

(b)  where identification of a person as a perpetrator may be relevant in a determination regarding whether to grant or deny a license, privilege, or approval made by:

(i)  the department;

(ii)  the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing;

(iii)  the Bureau of Licensing, within the Department of Health;

(iv)  any government agency specifically authorized by statute to access or use the information in the database; or

(v)  an agency of another state that performs a similar function to an agency described in Subsections (3)(b)(i) through (iv); or

(c)  as otherwise specifically provided by law.

